Louisiana, session 2026, HB921.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3270, 3271, 3272(A)(2), (5), (6), (9), (11), (13) through (15), (17),
and (18), 3273(B) and (C), 3274(A)(1) through (5), (7), and (11), (B)(1) through (4), (6), (7),
(10), and (11), (C), and (D), 3275, 3279(A)(3), 3283(A), (D), and (F)(1) and (2),
3284(B)(1), (4), and (5), (E), (F), and (J), 3287(C), 3288 and 3293(C)(1) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 37:3272(21) through (25), 3273(I), 3274(A)(12), 3279.1, and 3284.1
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
§3270. Declaration of purpose
A. The Legislature of Louisiana declares that it is necessary to require the
licensure and regulation of private security agents and businesses to be in the best
interest of the citizens of this state licensees, qualifying agents, and security officers
to promote professionalism and serve the citizens of this state.
B. The purpose of this Chapter is to require qualifying criteria establish
qualifying criteria and oversight mechanisms in a professional field in which
unqualified or unethical individuals may injure the public. The requirements of this
Chapter will are intended to contribute to the safety, health, and welfare, and
accountability of the people of Louisiana.
§3271. Private security law; short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Private Security
Regulatory and Licensing Law "Louisiana Private Security Licensing and Regulatory
Act".
§3272. General definition of terms
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meanings ascribed to them unless otherwise defined in this Chapter:
* * *
(2) "Armed security officer" is an individual who provides security services
and who at any time wears, carries, possesses, or has access to a firearm or any other
weapon defined by the board. All other defensive or offensive weapons not
approved by the board are prohibited means an individual employed by a licensed
contract security company or proprietary security organization who carries or has
access to an approved firearm in the performance of official duties and who has met
all qualifications, training, and certification requirements established by the board.
* * *
(5) "Branch manager" means the individual endowed with the responsibility
and liability for a branch office designated by the licensee responsible for the
management, supervision, and regulatory compliance of a branch office licensed by
the board.
Page 2 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(6) "Branch office" means a separate office which is part of a company
licensed by the board any separate business location operated pursuant to a license
issued by the board.
* * *
(9) "Executive secretary director" means the chief administrative officer of
the board.
* * *
(11) "Licensee" means any person to whom a license is granted in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter or business entity licensed by the
board in accordance with this Chapter.
* * *
(13) "Person" means an individual, firm, association, company, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit organization, limited liability company, or other legal entity
recognized in accordance with the laws of this state.
(14) "Principal corporate officer" means the president, vice president,
treasurer, secretary, or comptroller, or any other person who performs functions for
the corporation corresponding to those performed by the foregoing officers who
performs equivalent duties within the business organization.
(15) "Private security business" is any entity that provides protection to
persons and property, excluding any law enforcement agency, but including any of
the following:
(a) Contract security company; or.
(b) Armored car company or armed courier company.
* * *
(17) "Registrant" means an individual who holds a valid registration card
issued by the board a current registration issued by the board in accordance with this
Chapter.
(18) "Registration card" means the identification card issued by the board to
a registrant as evidence that the registrant has met the required minimum
Page 3 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
qualifications a physical or digital credential issued by the board evidencing that the
registrant has met the qualifications and training required by this Chapter.
* * *
(21) "Canine handler" means a licensed security officer registered with the
board who has completed a board-approved training program and who is certified to
deploy with a security canine or detector canine.
(22) "Canine team" means a canine and its assigned handler who function
as a unit.
(23) "Detector canine" means a dog specifically trained and certified for use
in private-security operations to detect explosives or controlled dangerous substances
by olfactory means. Detector canines shall operate solely for detection and
notification purposes and shall not be used to conduct searches, seizures, or arrests.
(24) "Digital credential" means an electronic license or registration card
issued by the board that verifies the person's qualifications and status.
(25) "Security canine" means a dog specifically trained and certified for use
in private-security patrol operations including deterrence, handler protection, and
property protection.
* * *
§3273. Louisiana State Board of Private Security Examiners; creation; qualification;
domicile; term of office; confirmation; oath of office; compensation
* * *
B.(1) The board shall consist of nine members, all domiciled in this state and
approved by the governor. appointed by the governor. One member shall be
appointed from and shall reside in each of the five public service commission
districts established by law. Four members shall be appointed from the state at large.
Each member shall be a citizen of the United States of America, a resident of
Louisiana, and at least thirty years of age, and shall have been actively engaged in
the private security business for at least five years. One of the members appointed
at large shall be a representative of a nationally operated security company. Each
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
member shall be licensed or registered with the board or a corporate officer of a
licensed company.
(2)(a) Five members will be members of the private security industry,
appointed by the governor, and shall be one of the following:
(i) Company owner.
(ii) Qualifying agent.
(iii) Instructor.
(b) From the five members listed in this Paragraph, one member shall reside
in each of the five districts composed as follows:
(i) District 1: The parishes of Orleans, Plaquemines, and St. Bernard.
(ii) District 2: The parishes of Assumption, Jefferson, Lafourche, St. Charles,
St. James, St. John the Baptist, St. Tammany, Terrebonne, and Washington.
(iii) District 3: The parishes of Ascension, East Baton Rouge, East Feliciana,
Iberville, Livingston, St. Helena, St. Martin, Tangipahoa, West Baton Rouge, and
West Feliciana.
(iv) District 4: The parishes of Acadia, Allen, Avoyelles, Beauregard,
Calcasieu, Cameron, Evangeline, Grant, Iberia, Jefferson Davis, Lafayette,
Natchitoches, Pointe Coupee, Rapides, Sabine, St. Landry, St. Mary, Vermilion, and
Vernon.
(v) District 5: The parishes of Bienville, Bossier, Caddo, Caldwell,
Catahoula, Claiborne, Concordia, DeSoto, East Carroll, Franklin, Jackson, LaSalle,
Lincoln, Madison, Morehouse, Ouachita, Red River, Richland, Tensas, Union,
Webster, West Carroll, and Winn.
(c) One of the five members listed in this Paragraph shall be affiliated with
a nationally operated security company.
(d) Each member listed in this Paragraph shall be licensed with the board or
serve as a corporate officer of a licensed security company.
(e) Each member listed in this Paragraph shall have been actively engaged
in the private security industry for a minimum of five years.
(3) Four members will be appointed at-large from the following agencies:
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(a) One at-large member nominated from the tourism industry by the
lieutenant governor.
(b) One at-large member nominated from the insurance industry by the
commissioner of the Department of Insurance.
(c) One at-large member nominated from the law enforcement community
by the superintendent of the office of state police.
(d) One at-large member nominated from the Academy Directors
Association by the director of the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice.
(4) The governor may remove any or all members of the board for
inefficiency or neglect of duty.
C. The board shall be domiciled in Baton Rouge, but shall be authorized to
may meet elsewhere in the state.
* * *
I. The board is prohibited from adopting any rules or regulations that would
impose additional eligibility requirements for membership.
§3274. Powers, duties, authorities, and responsibilities; meetings; quorum
A. The board shall:
(1) Examine all applicants to be licensed and regulated under in accordance
with the provisions of this Chapter through written or digital application and
verification systems.
(2) Administer a written an examination for prospective licensees at least
twice each year.
(3) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to govern the practice of
private security in the state of Louisiana this state in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) Issue, suspend, modify, place on probation, or revoke digital or physical
licenses or registration cards to provide credentials authorizing private security in the
state of Louisiana services within this state.
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(5) Report to the attorney general of the state of Louisiana all persons
violating the provisions of this Chapter Refer matters of potential criminal or civil
violation to appropriate authorities as deemed necessary, in consultation with the
board's legal counsel.
* * *
(7) Report annually, no later than March 1, to the governor, the secretary of
the department, and the legislature on its activities to the governor, the legislative
auditor, and the commissioner of administration on its operations, finances, and
regulatory activities.
* * *
(11) Adopt rules to authorize the assessment of administrative penalties in
the form of fines not to exceed five hundred dollars per violation and cost of the
board's proceedings pursuant to this Chapter.
(12) Adopt rules to regulate private security canine programs and
deployments, including the licensing, training, certification, deployment,
recertification, and discipline of canine handlers, security canines, and detector
canines in compliance with applicable state and federal law.
B. The board may:
(1) Adopt and enforce rules and regulations, bylaws, and rules of
professional conduct as the board may deem necessary and proper to regulate private
security businesses in the state of Louisiana this state, to provide for the efficient
operation of the board, and otherwise to discharge its duties and powers under in
accordance with this Chapter.
(2) Prescribe and adopt regulations, standards, procedures, and policies
governing the manner and conditions under which credit shall be given by the board
for participation in a program of continuing professional education such as the board
may consider necessary and appropriate to maintain the highest standards of the
private security industry in the state of Louisiana. in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, governing the manner and conditions in which credit
may be granted by the board for participation in continuing professional education
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
programs, when such requirements are reasonably related to maintaining professional
competence and protecting public safety within the private security industry in this
state.
(3) Authorize any the chairperson, executive director, or any designated
member of the board to make any affidavit necessary for the issuance of any
injunction or other legal process authorized under pursuant to this Chapter or under
in accordance with the rules and regulations of the board.
(4) Issue subpoenas to require attendance and testimony and the production
of documents, for the purpose of enforcing the laws relative to the private security
industry and securing evidence of violations thereof or subpoenas duces tecum to
require attendance, testimony, or production of records necessary to enforce this
Chapter and obtain evidence of violations.
* * *
(6) Appoint a qualified executive secretary director.
(7) Employ clerical assistance staff as necessary to carry out the
administrative work functions of the board.
* * *
(10) Purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire any real or personal property,
including making or entering into mortgages, as may be necessary or convenient to
the exercise of its powers in order to accomplish the purposes of this Chapter. The
board shall take title to and hold such property in its name as an agency of the state,
under the fiscal control of the division of administration and subject to state property
management requirements.
(11) When a state of emergency has been declared in this state pursuant to
R.S. 14:329.6, authorize the temporary operation of out-of-state private security
businesses within the state and the use of its employees within the state for the
duration of the state of emergency or for a stipulated amount of time after declaration
of the state of emergency, not to exceed thirty days from the last day of the declared
state of emergency, if the private security business:
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(a) Is licensed in another state in which the qualifications, insurance, and
training, and other similar requirements are at least equal to those required under this
Chapter are substantially equivalent to those of this Chapter.
(b) Has notified the board that they intend of intent to operate in the state and
submits all information required documentation requested by the board.
C. The chairman chairperson and executive secretary director of the board,
or in their absence any other member of the board, may administer oaths in the
taking of testimony upon any matter appertaining to the duties and powers of the
board.
D. The board shall meet quarterly every other month at regular meetings
each year. A special meeting may be held at such time and place as specified by the
executive secretary director on call of the chairman chairperson or any four
members. The executive secretary director shall give written notice of all meetings
to the members of the board and to the interested public, and may conduct meetings
by electronic means in accordance with the Open Meetings Law, R.S. 42:11 et seq.
* * *
§3275. Executive secretary director; duties
The position of executive secretary director of the board is hereby created.
The executive secretary director shall be appointed by the board and shall serve as
its chief administrator administrative and operational officer. He shall not be a
member of the board, but shall be a full-time employee of the board, to be paid
compensation compensated in an amount to be determined by the board. The
executive secretary director shall perform such the duties as may be and exercise the
authority as prescribed by the board, and shall employ such persons as he deems
necessary and fix their compensation. including oversight of licensing operations,
technology systems, compliance programs, and enforcement of this Chapter. The
executive director shall employ, supervise, and assign personnel as necessary and fix
their compensation within the limits of the board's approved budget. He shall have
no financial or business interests, contingent dealings or otherwise, in the security
services investigative business, watch, guard, or patrol agency while so employed or
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
for a period of direct or indirect financial or business interest in any private security
business while employed or for five years thereafter.
* * *
§3279. Approval, denial; procedure; appeals; prior qualifications
A. The procedure of the board in approving or denying an application shall
be as follows:
* * *
(3)(a) If the grounds for denial are subject to correction by the applicant, the
notice of denial shall so state and the applicant shall be given ten days after receipt
of such notice or, upon application, a reasonable additional period of time within
which to make the required correction.
(b) If the application is denied, the applicant, within thirty days after receipt
of notice of denial from the board, may request a hearing on the denial, pursuant to
R.S. 37:3279.1. Within ten days after the filing of such request for hearing by the
applicant, the board shall schedule a hearing to be held after due notice to the
applicant. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
* * *
§3279.1. Appeals; hearings; procedures; due process
A. The board shall conduct all adjudicatory proceedings in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., and the provisions of this
Chapter.
B. The board shall communicate to the applicant or licensee all denials,
suspensions, orders, administrative penalties, and revocations in writing.
C. Upon written notice of adverse or disciplinary action from the board, the
applicant or licensee has the right to elect to file a hearing with the board or the
division of administrative law within thirty days from the receipt of the notice.
(1) If the applicant or licensee elects to have a hearing by the board and does
not prevail, the ruling of the board may be appealable with the division of
administrative law.
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(2) If the applicant or licensee elects to have a hearing by the division of
administrative law, the ruling shall be appealable by either the board or the applicant
or licensee, whichever does not prevail.
D. Any party subject to a hearing may be represented by legal counsel and
present evidence and testimony and has the right to due process.
E. All hearings shall be recorded, and a complete record of all proceedings
shall be made.
F. The appellant shall assume all costs associated with appeals.
* * *
§3283. Security officer and security operations manager registrant; card;
application; qualifications; investigation; denial, suspension, or revocation;
validity; renewal; change of address
A.(1) Each person who performs the functions and duties of a security
officer or security operations manager within this state as defined in this Chapter
shall apply to the board for a registration card.
(2) The portion of the board application indicating temporary registration
shall be carried by the applicant when he is within the scope of his employment until
such time as he receives his permanent registration card from the board.
(3) (2)(a) Individuals An individual required to obtain a registration card
under this Chapter shall file for a registration card and, upon completion thereof, the
licensee shall immediately forward the application shall submit a sworn application
to the board for review.
(b) Every applicant shall remit all required fees with the application to the
board.
(4)(a) Every applicant for a registration card shall make and deliver to the
licensee a sworn application in writing upon a form prescribed by the board.
(b) (3)(a) The board shall prescribe by rule the form for such application and
procedures for their its submission, consideration, and disposition, including the fee
to accompany the application.
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(c) (b) To be eligible to apply for a registration card an individual shall have
the same qualifications required of an applicant provided in R.S. 37:3276 but may
be a resident alien.
* * *
D. After receipt of an application for a registration card, the board shall
conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth in the application
are true. Actions by the board to approve or deny an application for a registration
card shall be the same as that action taken to deny or approve an application for
license as provided in R.S. 37:3279 37:3279.1.
* * *
F.(1) Registration cards issued by the board shall be valid for a period of two
years. The registrant shall be required to advise the board of any changes in his
status or permanent address during the valid period. The cardholder shall file a
registration card renewal form with the board not less than thirty days prior to the
expiration of the card, together with the fee for renewal. The renewal application
shall include a statement by the registrant that the registrant continues to meet the
qualifications as set forth by the board.
(2) The board may refuse to renew a registration card, and shall promptly
notify the cardholder of its intent to refuse to renew. The cardholder, within fifteen
days after receipt of such notice, may request a hearing on such refusal, in the same
manner and in accordance with the same procedure as that provided in R.S. 37:3279
37:3279.1.
* * *
§3284. Training of security officers; requirements
* * *
B.(1) Any security officer employed after the effective date of this Chapter
shall complete, within thirty days of his first work assignment, either eight hours of
classroom training or an approved curriculum-based training course under a licensed
instructor and successfully pass an examination on the prescribed material which
shall include the following topics: A security officer shall complete, prior to his first
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
work assignment, a minimum of sixteen hours of board-required training consisting
of Security Officer Standards and Training, or S.O.S.T, by a board-licensed
instructor and successfully pass an examination for each course.
(a) Orientation to R.S. 37:3270 through 3299 and the board's rules and
regulations.
(b) Legal powers and limitations of a security officer.
(c) Emergency procedures.
(d) General duties/field notes/report writing.
* * *
(4) Security officers shall have sixty days from the date of the first work
assignment to complete either an additional eight hours of classroom training or an
approved curriculum-based training course under a licensed instructor, as prescribed
by the board, and successfully pass a fifty-question test administered by the licensed
instructor by achieving a minimum score of seventy percent who are registered in
other states with licensing requirements similar to this state and law enforcement
officers identified in this Section, may attend, prior to his first work assignment, four
hours of board-required training consisting of Security Officer Standards and
Training, or S.O.S.T, by a board-licensed instructor and successfully pass an
examination.
(5) No more than two sixteen hours of the training requirements provided for
in Paragraphs (1), and (2), and (4) of this Subsection may be conducted during a
twenty-four-hour period.
* * *
E. All classroom training required by this Chapter shall be administered by
a licensed instructor who is approved by the board, meets the qualifications of an
applicant as required by R.S. 37:3276(A)(1) through (6), and at least one of the
following:
(1) Is approved by the board.
(2) Meets the qualifications of an applicant as required by R.S.
37:3276(A)(1) through (6);
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(3) (1) Has a minimum of three years supervisory experience with a contract
security company, proprietary security organization, or with any federal, state, local,
parochial, municipal, or United States military law enforcement agency; or.
(4) (2) Degree Has a degree in administration of justice or the equivalent
thereof from an accredited college or university; or.
(5) (3) Is a P.O.S.T. certified instructor; or.
(6) (4) Teaching Has a teaching certificate issued by the state of Louisiana,
Department of Education, or the equivalent thereof, and one year supervisory
experience in the security field.
F. All firearms training required by this Chapter shall be administered by a
licensed instructor who does both of the following:
(1) Meets the same qualifications of a classroom instructor as required by
Subsection E; and of this Section.
(2) Has successfully completed training and possesses a National Rifle
Association Security or Police Firearms Instructor certificate, or a P.O.S.T. Firearm
Instructor Certificate, or a Department of Energy Firearms Instructor Certificate, or
certification by a branch of the United States military.
* * *
J. Current and former law enforcement officers or current or former military
law enforcement officers who have successfully completed a P.O.S.T. certification
and firearms training program or equivalent within one year prior to application may
submit proof of such documentation to the board as proof of training, which shall be
considered the equivalent of the classroom training for security officers as required
in Paragraphs (B)(1), and (2), and (4) of this Section, but shall not exempt them from
the requirements of Paragraph (D)(1) of this Section.
§3284.1. Security canine and detector canine programs
A. The board shall license and regulate canine handlers and canine teams.
B. The board shall be responsible for determining the approval of any canine
training program and the board shall establish minimum standards for certification
and recertification of security canines, detector canines, and their handlers.
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
C. A canine may not be deployed by a licensee unless both the canine and
its handler are certified in accordance with rules adopted by the board.
D. Detector canine programs shall be conducted in compliance with all
applicable federal laws and regulations, including but not limited to those
administered by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and the Bureau
of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives.
E. Any positive indication of explosives or controlled dangerous substances
by a detector canine team shall be immediately reported to the appropriate law
enforcement authority.
F. The board shall require each licensee employing canine teams to maintain
liability insurance coverage.
* * *
§3287. Renewal of license, certificate; penalty
* * *
C. The licensee, within fifteen thirty days after receipt of such notice of
intent to refuse to renew a license, may request a hearing on such refusal pursuant
to R.S. 37:3279.1. A licensee shall be permitted to continue to be engaged in
business while his renewal application is pending.
§3288. Administrative penalties
A.(1) Any person who is determined by the board, after reasonable notice
and opportunity for a fair and impartial hearing held conducted in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act and R.S. 37:3279.1, to have committed an
egregious act that is a or willful violation of this Chapter or regulation or rule issued
thereunder or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this Chapter is subject to an
administrative penalty of not more than five thousand dollars per violation per day
and shall subject such person to revocation of his license. The board may, upon
written findings of fact and conclusions of law, impose probation, suspension, or
revocation of any license or registration issued in accordance with this Chapter.
Such egregious acts shall include but not be limited to the following:
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
(a) Knowingly operating Operating a private security business without
meeting maintaining the insurance requirements as provided for in this Chapter.
(b) Consistently Repeatedly or deliberately operating a private security
business in violation of the insurance requirements provided for in this Chapter.
(c) Submitting fraudulent documents to the board as required or requested
by the board or causing to be submitted false, forged, fraudulent, or materially
misleading documents or information to the board.
(d) Forgery of, altering, or falsifying any documentation or information
submitted or required to be submitted to the board.
(e) Operating a private security business without obtaining the required
firearms training or allowing personnel to operate in a capacity requiring firearms
authorization without the required firearms training, certification, or qualification.
(2) Any person committing any non-egregious acts in a non-egregious
violation of this Chapter or any regulation or rule issued thereunder pursuant to this
Chapter is subject to an administrative penalty of not more than one thousand dollars
per violation per day. In lieu of a fine for a first-time, non-willful violation, the
board may issue a written warning or require the violator to complete a corrective
action plan within a prescribed time period.
B. The board, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, may and
the division of administration shall adopt a schedule of administrative penalties and
corrective actions for minor violations that can be assessed by the executive
secretary director when the violator waives the right to an administrative hearing.
* * *
§3293. Cease and desist order; injunctive relief
* * *
C.(1) Upon a proper showing by the board that such person or firm has
engaged in any activity, conduct, or practice prohibited by this Chapter, the court
shall issue a temporary restraining order restraining the person or firm from engaging
in unlawful activity, conduct, or practices pending the hearing on a preliminary
injunction, and in due course a permanent injunction shall be issued after a hearing
Page 16 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 921 ENROLLED
pursuant to R.S. 37:3279.1, commanding the cessation of the unlawful activity,
conduct, or practices complained of, all without the necessity of the board having to
give bond as usually required in such cases.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 37:3273(B) as enacted by this Act shall apply only
to board members appointed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 3.(A) The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to change all
references from "chairman" to "chairperson" and from "executive secretary" to "executive
director" in Chapter 47 of Title 37.
(B) The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to change all references
from "Private Security and Licensing Law" to "Louisiana Private Security Licensing and
Regulatory Act" throughout the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 17 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.